sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Tillbehör till skrivare, kopiator och fax > Förbrukningsvaror för skrivare > Underhållskit för skrivare: Fuser- och rullunderhållskit; Underhållspatroner och -tankar; Skrivarrengörings- och -spolningslösningar; Resttonerbehållare
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > Printer, Copier & Fax Machine Accessories > Printer Consumables > Printer Maintenance Kits: Fuser & Roller Maintenance Kits; Maintenance Cartridges & Tanks; Printer Cleaning & Flushing Solutions; Waste Toner Containers
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > Yazıcı, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Aksesuarları > Yazıcı Sarf Malzemeleri > Yazıcı Bakım Kitleri: Isıtıcı ve Rulo Bakım Kitleri; Bakım Kartuşları ve Tankları; Yazıcı Temizleme ve Yıkama Çözeltileri; Atık Toner Kapları
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Accessoires voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines > Verbruiksartikelen voor printer > Onderhoudskits voor printer: Fuser- en rolleronderhoudsset; Onderhoudscartridges en tanks; Printerreiniging en spoeloplossingen; Afvaltonercontainers
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Příslušenství k tiskárnám, kopírkám, skenerům a faxům > Spotřební zboží pro tiskárny > Sady pro údržbu tiskáren: Sady pro údržbu fixátorů a válců; Údržbové kazety a nádrže; Čisticí a proplachové roztoky pro tiskárny; Nádoby na odpadní toner
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų priedai > Spausdintuvų eksploatacinės medžiagos > Spausdintuvų priežiūros rinkiniai: Lydintuvo ir volelio priežiūros rinkiniai; Priežiūros kasetės ir bakeliai; Spausdintuvo valymo ir plovimo tirpalai; Naudotų dažų miltelių konteineriai
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxgép-kiegészítők > Nyomtató fogyóeszközök > Nyomtatókarbantartási készletek: Beégető és görgőkarbantartó készletek; Karbantartó kazetták és tartályok; Nyomtatótisztító és -öblítő oldatok; Hulladék toner tartályok
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Accesorios para máquinas de fax, impresoras y fotocopiadoras > Consumibles para impresoras > Kits de mantenimiento de impresoras: Kit de mantenimiento de fusor y rodillo; Cartuchos y tanques de mantenimiento; Soluciones de limpieza y lavado de impresora; Contenedores de tóner residual
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Akcesoria do kopiarek, drukarek i faksów > Materiały eksploatacyjne do drukarek > Zestawy do konserwacji drukarek: Zestawy konserwacji fusera i rolek; Kartridże i zbiorniki konserwacyjne; Roztwory do czyszczenia i płukania drukarek; Pojemniki na zużyty toner
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de máquinas de fax, copiadoras e impressoras > Itens para impressora > Kits de manutenção para impressoras: Kit de manutenção de fusor e rolo; Cartuchos e tanques de manutenção; Soluções de limpeza e descarga para impressora; Recipientes de toner residual
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 打印机、复印机和传真机配件 > 打印机耗材 > 打印机维护套件: 定影器和辊筒维护套件; 维护墨盒和墨槽; 打印机清洁液和冲洗液; 废粉容器
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > Tulostinten, kopiokoneiden ja faksien lisätarvikkeet > Tulostintarvikkeet > Tulostimen huoltosarjat: Kiinnitysyksikön ja telan huoltokokonaisuus; Huoltokasetti ja säiliö; Tulostimen puhdistus- ja huuhteluratkaisu; Jätevärikasetti
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 印表機/影印機/傳真機配件 > 印表機耗材 > 印表機維護工具組: 定影器及滾筒保養套組; 保養墨粉盒及墨水筒; 印表機清潔及沖洗溶液; 廢粉收集盒
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Príslušenstvo k tlačiarňam, kopírkam a faxom > Spotrebný materiál do tlačiarní > Súpravy na údržbu tlačiarne: Údržbové súpravy fixačnej jednotky a valčekov; Údržbové kazety a nádrže; Čistiace a preplachovacie roztoky pre tlačiarne; Nádoby na odpadový toner
fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Accessoires pour imprimantes, copieurs et télécopieurs > Matériel pour imprimante > Kits de maintenance pour imprimante: Kits de maintenance du fuseur et des rouleaux; Cartouches et réservoirs de maintenance; Solutions de nettoyage et de rinçage pour imprimante; Conteneurs de toner usagé
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Phụ kiện máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax > Vật tư máy in > Bộ dụng bảo dưỡng máy in: Bộ kit bảo trì Fuser và con lăn; Hộp mực và bình bảo trì; Dung dịch làm sạch và xả máy in; Thùng chứa bột thải
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > Zubehör für Drucker, Kopierer & Faxgeräte > Drucker-Verbrauchsmaterial > Druckerwartungssets: Wartungssätze für Fixiereinheiten und Walzen; Wartungspatronen und -tanks; Drucker-Reinigungs- und -Spüllösungen; Resttonerbehälter
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Dodatki za tiskalnike, kopirne stroje in fakse > Potrošni material za tiskalnike > Kompleti za vzdrževanje tiskalnika: Kompleti za vzdrževanje fiksirnih enot in valjev; Vzdrževalni kartridži in rezervoarji; Raztopine za čiščenje in izpiranje tiskalnikov; Posode za odpadni toner
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > Tilbehør til skrivere, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner > Forbruksmateriell til skrivere > Vedlikeholdssett for skrivere: Vedlikeholdssett til fikseringsenhet og ruller; Vedlikeholdspatroner og tanker; Skriverrengjørings- og skylleløsninger; Avfallstonerbeholdere
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de impressora, copiadora e fax > Consumíveis de impressora > Kits de manutenção de impressora: Kit de manutenção de fusor e rolos; Cartuchos e depósitos de manutenção; Soluções de limpeza e descarga de impressora; Contentores de resíduos de toner
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Accessori per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax > Materiali di consumo stampante > Kit di manutenzione stampanti: Kit di manutenzione del fusore e dei rulli; Cartucce e serbatoi di manutenzione; Soluzioni di pulizia e lavaggio della stampante; Contenitori per toner di scarto
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์ > ของสิ้นเปลืองสำหรับเครื่องพิมพ์ > ชุดบำรุงรักษาเครื่องพิมพ์: ชุดบำรุงรักษาฟิวเซอร์และโรลเลอร์; ตลับและถังบำรุงรักษา; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดและล้างเครื่องพิมพ์; ถังเก็บผงหมึกเสีย
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > プリンター・コピー機関連用品 > プリンター消耗品 > プリンターメンテナンスキット: 定着器・ローラーメンテナンスキット; メンテナンスカートリッジとタンク; プリンタークリーニング・フラッシング液; 廃トナーコンテナ
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Accesorii pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri > Consumabile pentru imprimante > Seturi de întreținere pentru imprimante: Kituri de întreținere pentru fusor și role; Cartușe și rezervoare de întreținere; Soluții de curățare și spălare pentru imprimante; Containere pentru toner rezidual
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Аксесоари за принтери, копирни машини и факс машини > Консумативи за принтери > Комплекти за поддръжка на принтери: Комплекти за поддръжка на термоблок и ролка; Резервоари и глави за поддръжка; Разтвори за почистване и промиване на принтер; Контейнери за отпаден тонер
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Аксессуары для принтеров, копиров и факсов > Расходные материалы для принтеров > Наборы для обслуживания принтеров: Комплекты для обслуживания термоблоков и роликов; Картриджи и емкости для обслуживания; Чистящие и промывочные растворы для принтеров; Контейнеры для отработанного тонера
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Tilbehør til printer, kopimaskine og fax > Printer – forbrugsstoffer > Printer – vedligeholdelsessæt: Fuser- og rullevedligeholdelsessæt; Vedligeholdelsespatroner og -tanke; Printerrensnings- og skyllemidler; Affaldstonerbeholdere
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Αξεσουάρ εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ > Αναλώσιμα εκτυπωτών > Κιτ συντήρησης εκτυπωτών: Κιτ συντήρησης fuser & κυλίνδρων; Κασέτες & δεξαμενές συντήρησης; Διαλύματα καθαρισμού & ξεβγάλματος εκτυπωτή; Δοχεία toner απόρρριψης
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Dodaci za pisače, fotokopirne i faks uređaje > Potrošni materijal za pisače > Kompleti za održavanje pisača: Kompleti za održavanje grijača i valjka; Spremnici i tankovi za održavanje; Otopine za čišćenje i ispiranje pisača; Spremnici za otpadne tonere
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 프린터/복사기/팩스 부대용품 > 프린터 소모품 > 프린터 관리 키트: 퓨저 및 롤러 유지보수 키트; 유지보수 카트리지 및 탱크; 프린터 세척 및 플러싱 용액; 폐토너 용기